Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin TRANSFER.new text end new text begin On June 30, 2026, the commissioner of management and budget must make a onetime transfer of $70,000,000 from the family and medical benefit insurance account established in Minnesota Statutes, section 268B.02, subdivision 4, to the general fund. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end